Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4129.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 12, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1738, to read: START_STATUTE41-1738. Law enforcement officer; mental health and wellness; confidentiality; policies; annual report; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, the department, in consultation with the Arizona peace officer standards and training board, shall establish a statewide law enforcement officer mental health and wellness program that provides access to all of the following to law enforcement officers in this state: 1. confidential mental health counseling. 2. Crisis counseling. 3. PEER SUPPORT COUNSELING. 4. Family support counseling. 5. Suicide prevention counseling and training. 6. Telehealth for law ENFORCEMENT officers in rural areas. 7. Any other support systems. B. Any support communication pursuant to this section shall remain confidential and may not be disclosed to any individual who was not present at the support counseling session. C. The department may accept and use federal monies, grants, gifts, donations and any funding available under the law enforcement mental health and wellness act of 2017 (P.L. 115113; 131 STAT. 2276) for the purposes of this section. D. The department shall establish WRITTEN policies and procedures for the program. all proceedings, records, opinions, conclusions and recommendations arising from any aspect of the program pursuant to this section are confidential and privileged from disclosure. E. The LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MENTAL HEALTH AND WELLNESS PROGRAM must PRIORITIZE providing support to law enforcement agencies in this state with two hundred or fewer sworn law enforcement officers. F. Beginning December 31, 2027 and each year thereafter, the department shall submit an annual report to the GOVERNOR, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives with the number of law enforcement officers in the program and any RECOMMENDATIONS regarding program improvements. G. For the PURPOSEs of this section, "law enforcement agency" means a municipal police department, a county sheriff's office, a publicly funded law enforcement department and the department of public safety. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of public safety; law enforcement officer mental health and wellness program; exemption A. The sum of $15,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety for the law enforcement officer mental health and wellness program established pursuant to section 41-1738, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. Of the monies appropriated pursuant to subsection A of this section, $5,000,000 shall be used to implement the law enforcement officer mental health and wellness program established by section 41-1738, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, for law enforcement agencies that have two hundred or fewer sworn law enforcement officers. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. Sec. 3. Legislative intent The legislature intends to strengthen public safety, reduce officer suicide and burnout and improve recruitment and retention, while preserving officer privacy and ensuring fiscal responsibility in this state.